New York, session 2025-2026, S10257.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 605 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 13 to read as follows: 3 13. New York state nursing faculty scholarship incentive program. a. 4 Purpose. The commissioner shall award scholarships for the purpose of 5 increasing the number of educators and adjunct clinical faculty teaching 6 in a field of nursing education in New York state. Such scholarships 7 shall be awarded on a competitive basis to applicants who are registered 8 professional nurses with previous clinical experience in nursing and who 9 demonstrate academic merit for admission to masters or doctoral programs 10 in nursing which will enhance the recipient's proficiency as a nursing 11 educator. Preference shall be given to applicants who are employed as 12 registered professional nurses, will attend such masters or doctoral 13 program full-time and whose cost to attend such program is partially 14 underwritten a minimum of twenty-five percent by agreement with a commu- 15 nity agency, health care provider and/or approved nursing program. 16 b. Eligibility. To be eligible for an award pursuant to this subdivi- 17 sion, applicants shall agree to serve, upon completion of the degree 18 program, as nursing educators or as adjunct clinical faculty in approved 19 nursing programs within New York state that lead to licensure in nursing 20 under article one hundred thirty-nine of this chapter. Applicants shall 21 serve the equivalent of nine months full-time service in such programs 22 for each annual award received by the recipient, but no less than two 23 academic years. Such service shall be completed and apportioned in 24 accordance with criteria established by the commissioner. Annual awards 25 shall not be made to applicants who enroll in less than fifteen hours of 26 academic credit applicable to the masters or doctoral program in which 27 they are enrolled in any calendar year. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09355-01-5 S. 10257 2 1 c. Agreements. The president shall, in consultation with the commis- 2 sioner, develop and secure from each successful applicant a written 3 agreement to serve as a nursing educator or adjunct clinical nurse 4 faculty in New York. Within such time as the commissioner shall by regu- 5 lation provide, a recipient of an award shall have served for that 6 number of months calculated by multiplying by nine the number of equal- 7 ized annual payments received by the recipient. In no case shall the 8 total number of months of service required be less than eighteen. If a 9 recipient fails to comply fully with such conditions, the president 10 shall be entitled to receive from such recipient an amount to be deter- 11 mined by the formula: 12 A = 2B (t-s) 13 ----- 14 t 15 in which "A" is the amount the president is entitled to recover; "B" is 16 the sum of all payments made to the recipient by the president and the 17 interest on such amount which would be payable if at the times such 18 awards were paid they were loans bearing interest at the maximum 19 prevailing rate; "t" is the total number of months in the recipient's 20 period of obligated services; and "s" is the number of months of service 21 actually rendered by the recipient. Any amount which the president is 22 entitled to recover under this paragraph shall be paid within the five- 23 year period beginning on the date that the recipient failed to comply 24 with this service condition. Nothing in the written agreement shall 25 affect the terms of employment of the individual who shall negotiate, 26 separate and apart from the program, their salary and other forms of 27 employment with an agency, institution, or a program in which they shall 28 be employed. 29 Any obligation to comply with such provisions as outlined in this 30 section shall be cancelled upon the death of the recipient. The commis- 31 sioner shall make regulations to provide for the waiver or suspension of 32 any financial obligation which would involve extreme hardship. 33 d. Reporting. A recipient of an award shall report annually to the New 34 York state higher education services corporation, on forms prescribed by 35 the president, as to the performance of the required services, commenc- 36 ing with the calendar year in which the recipient begins to engage in 37 the teaching or training of nursing students in a degree program at an 38 accredited nursing school in this state and continuing until the recipi- 39 ent shall have completed, or it is determined that the recipient shall 40 not be obligated to complete, the required services. If the recipient 41 shall fail to file any report required pursuant to this paragraph within 42 thirty days of written notice to the recipient, mailed to the address 43 shown on the last application for an award or last report filed, which- 44 ever is later, the president of the corporation may impose a fine of up 45 to one thousand dollars. The president shall have the discretion to 46 waive the filing of a report, excuse a delay in filing or a failure to 47 file a report, or waive or reduce any fine imposed for good cause shown. 48 e. Other awards. Award recipients shall be eligible to apply for addi- 49 tional awards. 50 § 2. The education law is amended by adding a new section 671-a to 51 read as follows: 52 § 671-a. New York state nursing faculty scholarship incentive program. 53 1. Number and certification. Thirty nursing scholarships for advanced 54 degrees in nursing shall be awarded each academic year beginning in the S. 10257 3 1 two thousand twenty-seven--two thousand twenty-eight academic year. Such 2 scholarships shall be allocated as provided in subdivision thirteen of 3 section six hundred five of this title to eligible students as certified 4 to the president by the commissioner, except that, in so far as is prac- 5 ticable, one-half of such scholarships shall be awarded to masters 6 degree candidates and one-half to doctoral degree candidates. 7 2. Duration. Each scholarship shall entitle the recipient to an annual 8 award while enrolled in an approved course of study leading to an 9 advanced degree in nursing or nursing education, but not exceeding the 10 period of study required to complete the program, as such progress, 11 approved courses and expected periods of study are defined by the 12 commissioner pursuant to article thirteen of this title. 13 3. Amount. The president shall make awards of fifteen thousand 14 dollars, or a prorated annual amount based on the number of credit hours 15 in which the recipient is enrolled, except that such annual award shall 16 not exceed the recipient's cost of attendance. "Cost of attendance" 17 shall mean the cost of: tuition at an approved masters or doctoral 18 program in nursing or nursing education, which the commissioner deter- 19 mines will enhance the recipient's proficiency as a nursing educator; 20 laboratory and other fees; room and board; supplies; transportation; 21 health insurance coverage; books; child care; and stipend for daily 22 living expenses in an amount to be determined by the president in 23 consultation with the commissioner. 24 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.